scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VII_V.yaml
     apiitaginde+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitagindeg
     apiitaginde+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: apiitagindemagad
     apiitagoode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitagoode
     apiitagoode+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitagoodeg 
     apiitagoode+VII+?+Pos+Neu+1Sg: epiitagoodeg
     apiitagoode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: apiitagoodemagad
     apiitakone+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitakone
     apiitakone+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitakoneg
     apiitakone+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitakoneg
     apiitaabikide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitaabikide
     apiitaabikide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitaabikideg
     apiitaabikide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitaabikideg
     apiitaagamide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitaagamide
     apiitaagamide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitaagamideg
     apiitaagamide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitaagamideg
     apiitaate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitaate
     apiitaate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitaateg
     apiitaate+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitaateg
     asabishkoode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asabishkoode
     asabishkoode+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asabishkoodeg
     asabishkoode+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: esabishkoodeg
     asiginigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asiginigaade
     asiginigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asiginigaadeg
     asiginigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: esiginigaadeg
     ashawegonde+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashawegonde
     ashawegonde+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashawegondeg
     ashawegonde+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eshawegondeg
     ashawegonde+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashawegondemagad
     ashawese+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashawese
     ashawese+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashaweseg
     ashawese+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eshaweseg
     ashi-bezhigo-diba'igane+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashi-bezhigo-diba'igane
     ashi-bezhigo-diba'igane+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashi-bezhigo-diba'iganeg
     ashkide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashkide
     ashkide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashkideg
     ashkide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eshkideg
     ashkide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: ashkidemagad
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ate
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ateg
     ate+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eteg
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: atemagad
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg: ateban
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg: atedog
     atite+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: atite 
     atite+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: atiteg
     atite+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: etiteg
     atite+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: atitemagad
     awasewebide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: awasewebide
     awasewebide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: awasewebideg
     awasewebide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ewasewebideg
     ayate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayate
     ayate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayateg
     ayate+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eyateg
     ayishpaabiigibide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayishpaabiigibide
     ayishpaabiigibide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayishpaabiigibideg
     ayishpaabiigibide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eyishpaabiigibideg
     azhashkiiwaagamin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhashkiiwaagamin
     azhashkiiwaagamin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhashkiiwaagamig
     azhashkiiwaagamin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ezhashkiiwaagamig
     azhebide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhebide
     azhebide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhebideg
     azhebide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ezhebideg
     azhegiiwebide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhegiiwebide
     azhegiiwebide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhegiiwebideg
     azhegiiwebide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ezhegiiwebideg
     azhenizha'igaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhenizha'igaade 
     azhenizha'igaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhenizha'igaadeg
     azhenizha'igaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ezhenizha'igaadeg
     azhese+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhese
     azhese+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azheseg
     azhese+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ezheseg
     azhese+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhesemagad
     azhewijigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhewijigaade
     azhewijigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhewijigaadeg
     azhewijigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ezhewijigaadeg
     azheyaaboode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azheyaaboode
     azheyaaboode+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azheyaaboodeg
     azheyaaboode+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ezheyaaboodeg
     aaba'igaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aaba'igaade
     aaba'igaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aaba'igaadeg
     aaba'igaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaaba'igaadeg
     aaba'igaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: aaba'igaademagad
     aabajichigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabajichigaade
     aabajichigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabajichigaadeg
     aabajichigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaabajichigaadeg
     aabawaate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabawaate
     aabawaate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabawaateg
     aabawaate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabawaatemagad
     aabaabika'igaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabaabika'igaade 
     aabaabika'igaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabaabika'igaadeg
     aabaabika'igaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaabaabika'igaadeg
     aabaabika'igaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: aabaabika'igaademagad
     aabaabiigise+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabaabiigise
     aabaabiigise+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabaabiigiseg
     aabaabiigise+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaabaabiigiseg
     aabidwewebide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabidwewebide
     aabidwewebide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabidwewebideg
     aabidwewebide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaabidwewebideg
     aabijibide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabijibide
     aabijibide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaabijibideg
     aabijibide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabijibidemagad
     aabise+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabise
     aabise+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabiseg
     aabise+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaabiseg
     aabise+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabisemagad
     aabiskonigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabiskonigaade
     aabiskonigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabiskonigaadeg
     aabiskose+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabiskose
     aabiskose+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabiskoseg
     aabiskose+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaabiskoseg
     aabiskose+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: aabiskosemagad
     aabiskweginigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabiskweginigaade
     aabiskweginigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabiskweginigaadeg
     aabiskweginigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaabiskweginigaadeg
     aabitawise+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabitawise
     aabitoose+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabitoose
     aabitoose+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabitooseg
     aabitoose+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaabitooseg
     aabitoose+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: aabitoosemagad
     aabitooshkine+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabitooshkine
     aabitooshkine+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabitooshkineg
     aabitooshkine+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaabitooshkineg
     aabitooshkine+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: aabitooshkinemagad
     aaboojigwaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aaboojigwaade
     aaboojigwaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aaboojigwaadeg
     aaboojiiginigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aaboojiiginigaade
     aaboojiiginigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aaboojiiginigaadeg
     aajikode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aajikode 
     aajikode+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aajikodeg
     aajikode+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaajikodeg
     aajikode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: aajikodemagad
     aakomaate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aakomaate
     aakomaate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aakomaateg
     aakomaate+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaakomaateg
     aakomaate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aakomaatemagad
     aakwaagamide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aakwaagamide
     aakwaagamide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aakwaagamideg
     aakwaagamin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aakwaagamin
     aakwaagamin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aakwaagaming
     aanikoogwaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanikoogwaade
     aanikoosijigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanikoosijigaade
     aanikoosijigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanikoosijigaadeg
     aanjibii'igaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanjibii'igaade
     aanjibii'igaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanjibii'igaadeg
     aanjichigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanjichigaade
     aanjichigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanjichigaadeg
     aanjidaabaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanjidaabaade
     aanjidaabaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanjidaabaadeg
     aanjidaabaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaanjidaabaadeg
     aanjigwaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanjigwaade
     aanjigwaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanjigwaadeg
     aanjinikaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanjinikaade
     aanjinikaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanjinikaadeg
     aanjinikaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaanjinikaadeg
     aanjinikaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanjinikaademagad
     aanjise+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanjise
     aanjise+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanjiseg
     aanjise+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg: aanjisemagad
     aapida'oode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aapida'oode
     aapida'oode+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aapida'oodeg
     aapida'oode+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaapida'oodeg
     aapida'oode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aapida'oodemagad
     aapidapide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aapidapide
     aapidapide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aapidapideg
     aapidapide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaapidapideg
     aapidapide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aapidapidemagad
     aapijibide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aapijibide
     aapijibide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aapijibideg
     aapijigise+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aapijigise
     aapijigise+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aapijigiseg
     aapijigise+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaapijigiseg
     aapijise+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aapijise
     aapijise+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aapijiseg
     aapijise+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaapijiseg
     aasamaate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aasamaate
     aasamaate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aasamaateg
     aasonigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aasonigaade
     aasonigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aasonigaadeg
     aasonigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaasonigaadeg
     aatawe+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aatawe
     aatawe+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aataweg
     aatawese+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aatawese
     aatawese+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aataweseg
     aate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aate
     aate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aateg
     aate+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaateg
     aate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: aatemagad
     aawajigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aawajigaade 
     aawajigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aawajigaadeg
     aazhawa'oojigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aazhawa'oojigaade
     aazhawa'oojigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aazhawa'oojigaadeg
     aazhawa'oojigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaazhawa'oojigaadeg
     aazhawamon+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aazhawamon
     aazhawamon+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aazhawamog 
     aazhawaandawemon+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aazhawaandawemon
     aazhawaandawemon+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aazhawaandawemog
